Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1985.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 113(b) of the act of November 30, 1965 (P.L.847, No.356), known as the Banking Code of 1965, is amended to read:Section 113. Legal Holidays* * *(b) Optional holidays--An institution may at its option 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425 observe as a legal holiday:(i) Lincoln's Birthday (February 12);(ii) Washington's Birthday (the third Monday in February);(iii) Good Friday;(iv) Flag Day (June 14);[(v) Columbus Day (the second Monday in October);](vi) Election Day (the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November);(vii) Veterans' Day (November 11);(viii) each Saturday either as a half-holiday after 12 o'clock noon or as a full holiday;(ix) each Monday following an Independence Day, a Christmas Day or New Year's Day which occurs on a Saturday; and(x) each day which the department permits all institutions by public announcement, or an individual institution by written permission, to observe as a legal holiday.* * *Section 2. Repeals are as follows:(1) The General Assembly declares that the repeal under paragraph (2) is necessary to effectuate the amendment of section 113(b) of the act.(2) The act of August 13, 1963 (P.L.660, No.345), entitled "An act providing for the observance of October 12 of each year as Columbus Day," is repealed.Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1985PN2504 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728